Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1034
Attached property; delivery to sheriff; power of court to compel.

The court may compel the delivery to the sheriff, for sale, of any of the attached property for which an undertaking may have been given, and may proceed summarily on such undertaking to enforce the delivery of the property or the payment of such sum as may be due upon the undertaking, by rules and attachments, as in cases of contempt.

R.S.1867, Code § 229, p. 431;

R.S.1913, § 7763;

C.S.1922, § 8707;

C.S.1929, § 20-1034;

R.S.1943, § 25-1034.